Utah statutes.
76-10-104.   Providing a cigar, cigarette, electronic cigarette, or tobacco to a minor -- Penalties.

(1)  Any person who knowingly, intentionally, recklessly, or with criminal negligence provides any cigar, cigarette, electronic cigarette, or tobacco in any form, to any person under 19 years of age, is guilty of a class C misdemeanor on the first offense, a class B misdemeanor on the second offense, and a class A misdemeanor on subsequent offenses.

(2)  For purposes of this section "provides":

(a)  includes selling, giving, furnishing, sending, or causing to be sent; and

(b)  does not include the acts of the United States Postal Service or other common carrier when engaged in the business of transporting and delivering packages for others or the acts of a person, whether compensated or not, who transports or delivers a package for another person without any reason to know of the package's content.



Amended by Chapter 114, 2010 General Session

